Hawaii statutes.
[§206M-15.1] Manufacturing development
program; established. (a) There is established the manufacturing
development program, through which the development corporation may provide
grants to any business in Hawaii that is a manufacturer in the State and requires
assistance for any of the following items:

(1) Purchasing of manufacturing equipment;

(2) Training of employees on the use of manufacturing
equipment;

(3) Improving existing energy efficiency
manufacturing equipment or the purchase of improved energy efficiency equipment
in the manufacturing process; or

(4) Studying or planning the implementation of a new
manufacturing facility;

provided that no grant shall exceed twenty per cent
of the cost of any of the above items, and no company shall receive a grant
exceeding $100,000 in any given year.

(b) All moneys necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section shall be appropriated by the legislature through
appropriations out of the state general fund.

(c) In reviewing grant applications pursuant
to this section, the development corporation shall analyze each application to
determine whether the item to be undertaken will be economically viable and
beneficial to the State.

(d) The development corporation shall submit a
report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
the regular session held in every even-numbered year. The report shall include
the following items:

(1) The total number of grants provided;

(2) The sectors provided with grants;

(3) The total projected economic and employment
growth facilitated by the grants provided; and

(4) The actual economic and employment growth that
occurred as a result of the grants provided. [L 2015, c 215, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next